Maryland, session 2026, HB0634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–207.
(a) The Commission has the following powers and duties:
(16) to require, for entrance–level police training and, as determined by the
Commission, for in–service level training conducted by the State and each county and
municipal police training school, that the curriculum and minimum courses of study
include, consistent with established law enforcement standards and federal and State
constitutional provisions:
(i) training in lifesaving techniques, including Cardiopulmonary
Resuscitation (CPR);
(ii) training in the proper level and use of force as set forth in the
Maryland Use of Force Statute under § 3–524 of this title;
(iii) training regarding sensitivity to cultural and gender diversity;
[and]
(iv) training regarding individuals with physical, intellectual,
developmental, and psychiatric disabilities; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 658 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) TRAINING REGARDING INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL
AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, DEMENTIA, AND AUTISM, INCLUDING
TRAINING FOR:
1. LOCATING AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS WANDERING,
ELOPING, OR OTHERWISE MISSING;
2. SEARCHING NEAR BODIES OF WATER;
3. SENSORY–AWARE APPROACHES;
4. REUNIFICATION;
5. DOCUMENTATION; AND
6. INTERAGENCY COORDINATION;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –